Washington statutes.
RCW 35.27.050

Report of survey.

The board of county commissioners, without unnecessary delay, shall make and file a report of their doings in the premises in the office of the county auditor, who shall transmit a certified copy thereof under the seal of the county, to the clerk of the town, and the clerk shall record the same in the records of the town, and keep the copy on file in his or her office. The report shall contain the description of the boundary of the town, as fixed by the board, written in plain words and figures and the boundaries so made and fixed shall be the boundaries of the town, and all the territory included within the boundary lines so established shall be included in the town, and be a part thereof.

[ 2009 c 549 s 2055; 1965 c 7 s 35.27.050. Prior: 1899 c 79 s 3; RRS s 9197.]